Hawaii statutes.
§501-110 Statement of encumbrances. If
at the time of any transfer there appears upon the registration book
encumbrances or claims adverse to the title of the registered owner, they shall
be stated in the new certificate or certificates, except as far as they may be
simultaneously released or discharged and except as provided in sections
501-241 to 501-248. [L 1903, c 56, §59; RL 1925, §3248; RL 1935, §5058; RL
1945, §12658; RL 1955, §342-59; HRS §501-110; am L 1998, c 219, §9]

Revision Note

"Sections 501-241 to 501-248" substituted for
"chapter 501, part ".

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 816, 822.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next